District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4301

Prohibition and control of net fishing in Potomac River

Repealed.

History

Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 815, Pub. L. 85-730, § 8(a), (e)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-1601 to 22-1606.